Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Part 2 Financial Management
46-1-214. Trust account reports required — Inspection of trust account records.

Not later than seventy-five (75) days after the end of each of its fiscal years, each cemetery company that engages in sales requiring the establishment of a trust account under this part shall file with the commissioner, on the prescribed form, a report containing:

Beginning balances of deposited funds and accumulated earnings in the trust account;

The deposits to the trust account during the year;

The amount of earnings during the year;

The amounts of the withdrawals of deposits and earnings remaining in trust at the end of the year; and

The aggregate procurement costs, including transportation and labor, of all cemetery merchandise and services sold pre-need and yet to be delivered after the report year end; provided, that deferred or installment payments may be prorated to the extent allowed under § 46-1-207.

The commissioner may require a cemetery company to submit reasonably detailed information in support of any report required under this section.

An additional report shall not be required based on the establishment of trusts pursuant to this title and the Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act, compiled in title 62, chapter 5, part 4. In such instance, only one (1) report shall be required.

Not later than seventy-five (75) days after the end of the cemetery company's fiscal year, each trustee appointed under this part shall file with the commissioner, on the prescribed form, a report on each trust account established pursuant to this part. However, an additional report shall not be required based on the establishment of trusts pursuant to this title and the Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act. In such instance, only one (1) report shall be required. The report shall contain the following information:

The combined beginning balance of deposits and earnings in trust;

The aggregate amount of deposits received during the report year;

The amount of the earnings added to the trust account during the year;

The aggregate amount of deposits and earnings disbursed during the report year; and

The aggregate amount of the deposits and earnings remaining in trust at the end of the report year.

For late filing of a report required under this section, a cemetery company shall pay a late penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each month or fraction of a month that the report is late. The commissioner is authorized to establish the amount of the late penalty by promulgating rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The commissioner may, in extenuating circumstances, grant an extension of time for filing a report and waive the penalty, on receipt of a written request before the report is overdue.

If, on or before the date that a report would otherwise be due, a cemetery company notifies the commissioner that it has delivered all cemetery merchandise and services due for which a trust account was required, the company need not file a report.

The commissioner shall promulgate and may, from time to time, revise rules and regulations for carrying out the intentions of this part, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The commissioner shall require an audit at least once every two (2) years, or more frequently if the commissioner deems it necessary, to ensure that each person, firm, or corporation that offers or enters into a contract for the sale of cemetery merchandise or services under this chapter will be able to perform its contract with the purchaser.

The necessary expenses for any examination pursuant to this section shall be paid by the cemetery company at a rate set by the commissioner.

Acts 1986, ch. 693, § 24; 1992, ch. 922, § 7; 1997, ch. 400, § 4; T.C.A. § 46-2-410; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 11, 12, 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 46-2-410 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Treble damages upon proof of fraud relative to contract for future services, § 62-5-409.

46-1-215. Financial reports.

Within seventy-five (75) days after the end of the calendar year or its fiscal year and within seventy-five (75) days on an annual basis thereafter, each cemetery company shall file with the commissioner a report of its condition, on forms provided by the commissioner, which report shall contain the following information:

The name of the cemetery company, the date of incorporation, if incorporated, and the location of the cemetery or cemeteries owned by the company;

The amounts of sales of cemetery lots, grave spaces, mausoleum crypts or niches for which payment has been made in full or certificates or deeds of conveyance issued on cemetery lots, grave spaces, crypt or niches during the preceding calendar or fiscal year;

The amounts received for the special care of any lots, graves, crypts, niches, family mausoleums, memorials, markers or monuments;

The amounts received for the memorial care of commodities;

The amounts paid into the permanent improvement care fund, and the income earned from the fund during the preceding fiscal year;

The number of acres embraced within each cemetery and held by the cemetery company for cemetery purposes;

The names and addresses of the owners of the cemetery company or the officers and directors of the corporation, and any change of control that has occurred during the past calendar or fiscal year; and

The total of all expenditures of income from the improvement care trust fund.

Within forty-five (45) days after the end of the calendar or fiscal year of the cemetery company, the trustee of the improvement care fund of the cemetery company shall file with the commissioner a financial report with respect to the trust fund on forms that are obtained from the commissioner. The report shall include, but not be limited to, specific disclosure of the following:

The current value of the assets, on both a book value and market value basis, and liabilities of the trust as of the beginning and end of the fiscal year of the trust;

All sales, exchanges, or leases of any property between the trust and the cemetery company, any owner of an interest in the cemetery company, any officers or directors or managers of the cemetery company, or immediate family of any such person;

Any loans by the trust or fixed income obligations due the trust that are classified as uncollectible or in default as of the close of the fiscal year of the trust;

Whether the trust at any time held twenty percent (20%) or more of its assets in any single security, debt, mortgage, parcel of real estate, or partnership/joint venture interests;

Whether the trust at any time engaged in any transaction or series of related transactions involving twenty percent (20%) or more of the current value of the trust; and

Whether there were any purchases of nonpublicly traded securities by the trust, the value of which was set without an appraisal by an independent third party.

The commissioner may require the trustee to make additional financial reports that the commissioner deems necessary.

For late filing of a report required under this section, a cemetery company shall pay a late penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each month or fraction thereof that the report is late. The commissioner is authorized to establish the amount of the late penalty by promulgating rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to require cemeteries to submit audited financial statements or other financial reports prepared by independent certified public accountants.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 3; mod. Code 1932, § 3924; Acts 1961, ch. 44, § 2; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-106; Acts 1973, ch. 272, § 7; 1976, ch. 773, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 46-206, 46-2-106; Acts 1980, ch. 780, § 4; 1995, ch. 203, § 2; 1995, ch. 485, §§ 1, 6; 1997, ch. 374, § 1; T.C.A., § 46-2-202; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3; 2009, ch. 356, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-202 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

Cross-References. Annual trust fund reports, § 46-1-214.

46-1-216. Verification of reports — Public records.

The annual reports required to be filed in this part shall be duly verified under oath by the owner of the cemetery company and the annual reports by the trustee of the trust fund. Upon filing, the reports shall become public records.

Acts 1927, ch. 75, § 3; mod. Code 1932, § 3925; Acts 1961, ch. 44, § 3; 1968, ch. 557, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 46-107; T.C.A., §§ 46-207, 46-2-107; Acts 1995, ch. 485, § 2; 1997, ch. 374, § 2; T.C.A., § 46-2-203; Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1927, ch. 75 was declared unconstitutional in Spring Hill Cem. v. Lindsey, 162 Tenn. 420, 37 S.W.2d 111 (1931).

Former § 46-2-203 was transferred to this section by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

46-1-217. Agreement with owners of real property to conduct improvement care to graves located on property.

Interested persons, as that term is defined in § 46-4-102, may enter into an agreement with the owners of real property that is not designated as a cemetery, but does have human remains with marked and identifiable graves, to conduct improvement care, as that term is defined in § 46-1-102, to the graves located on the real property. This section shall not be construed to require real property owners to provide the improvement care.

Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 9.

46-1-218. Net earnings of improvement care trust fund sufficient for permanent maintenance and upkeep.

When the improvement care trust fund has become sufficiently large that the net earnings, as defined in § 46-1-204, will ensure the permanent maintenance and upkeep of the cemetery, and the officers and board of directors are of the opinion that it is no longer necessary to continue to set aside twenty percent (20%) to the improvement care trust fund, or any part thereof, for the purpose of maintaining, keeping up and beautifying the cemetery, the board of directors may, in a regular or special meeting, pass a resolution declaring that belief.

The cemetery company shall then be authorized to file a petition in the name of the company in the chancery court of Davidson County stating the passage of the resolution and other pertinent facts as it may desire, and asking that the cemetery company no longer be required to continue to make contributions to the improvement care trust fund or that the contributions be reduced. The petition shall be filed against the commissioner of commerce and insurance. The petition shall be accompanied by an audited balance sheet prepared by a Tennessee certified public accountant showing the financial position of the cemetery company from the date of the petition seeking relief. All financial information submitted shall be kept strictly confidential and shall be subject to a protective order limiting access to the information to the court and the attorney representing the commissioner.

At the final hearing on the petition, the petitioner shall have the burden of proving its entitlement to relief by a preponderance of the evidence. In reaching its decision, the court shall consider at least the following factors, and shall state upon the record its findings:

The financial position of the cemetery company on the date the petition seeking relief was filed;

Whether the net earnings from the improvement care trust fund will be sufficient to provide future maintenance and upkeep of the cemetery for perpetuity; and

The number of lots or grave spaces intended to be used for interment purposes versus the number of lots or grave spaces that have already been sold and the likely impact of the future sale of lots or grave spaces on the cost of maintenance and upkeep.

Upon a final hearing of the issues, the chancery court is authorized to pronounce a decree that, in the opinion of the court from the proof and facts, either refusing any relief whatsoever or granting all of the relief prayed for, or granting any partial relief, that may appear proper to the court. The case shall be kept on the docket of the court, subject to any further orders and decrees that may from time to time appear proper upon any additional showing that may be made under any supplemental petition filed either by the original complainants, on behalf of the state, by any lot owner, or descendant or next of kin of a lot owner who may be entitled to any relief.

In no event shall any relief granted under this part affect the cemetery owner's other obligations under this chapter.

The cost and expenses of the proceeding in subsections (a)-(d) shall be taxed against and paid by the complainant, including reasonable and necessary attorney's fees to the defense attorney, to be determined by the court. The cost and expense shall be paid out of the complainant's general operating account and shall not be paid out of the principal of the improvement care trust fund.

In the event the commissioner determines that any of the following events have occurred, any relief granted by the court to the cemetery company shall immediately terminate and required contributions as set forth in § 46-1-204 shall be resumed without further orders of the court:

A finding by the commissioner that the balance of the improvement care trust fund has decreased by at least fifteen percent (15%) below the fair market value of the trust fund balance as of the date that the petition was filed;

Any sale or transfer that requires notice to the commissioner pursuant to § 46-1-107; or

Purchase of additional land by the cemetery company. The cemetery company shall provide notice of the purchase to the commissioner by certified mail within thirty (30) days of the purchase.

Notice of any event in subsection (g) shall be provided by the commissioner to the cemetery company by certified mail and the cemetery company shall resume its obligation to make contributions to the improvement care trust fund beginning with transactions occurring thirty (30) days following receipt of notice, unless it challenges the accuracy of the determination. Any challenge shall be resolved by the chancery court of Davidson County in accordance with subsection (d), with court costs taxed to the petitioner.

Acts 2007, ch. 515, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.